Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6902
Affiliation period, defined.

Affiliation period means a period which, under the terms of the health insurance coverage offered by a health maintenance organization, must expire before the health insurance coverage becomes effective.

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 2.